Utah statutes.
76-8-312.   Bail-jumping.

(1) A person is guilty of an offense when having been released on bail or on his own recognizance by court order or by other lawful authority upon condition that he subsequently appear personally upon a charge of an offense, he fails without just cause to appear at the time and place which have been lawfully designated for his appearance.

(2)  An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree when the offense charged is a felony, a class B misdemeanor when the offense charged is a misdemeanor, and an infraction when the offense charged is an infraction.



Amended by Chapter 32, 1974 General Session

